Utah statutes.
17-36-19.   Encumbrance system.

Each county shall use an encumbrance system or other budgetary controls to ensure that no expenditure is made for any item of an appropriation unless there is a sufficient unencumbered balance in the appropriation and available funds, except in cases of an emergency as hereinafter provided in Section 17-36-27.

